Mississippi, session 2026, HB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 45-13-9, the retail sale of consumer fireworks shall be permitted year-round in the State of Mississippi only under the following conditions: (a)  The retail establishment shall be located in a standalone commercial building containing not less than eight thousand (8,000) square feet of enclosed floor area. (b)  The building shall be fully protected by an automatic fire sprinkler system that complies with all applicable state and local fire and building codes. (c)  The retail establishment shall utilize age and location verification software to ensure compliance with all state laws governing the sale of consumer fireworks. (d)  The retail establishment shall be located no more than one-half (½) mile from an interstate highway, as measured by the most direct vehicular route. (e)  The retail establishment shall have been open and operational on the effective date of this act. (2)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to: (a)  Limit the authority of the State Fire Marshal to enforce fire safety standards; or (b)  Supersede local zoning ordinances that do not conflict with the provisions of this act. SECTION 2.  Section 45-13-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-13-9.  Except as otherwise provided in this act for retail establishments located in a standalone commercial building, no fireworks shall be sold or offered for sale at retail before the twenty-third day of May and after the twelfth day of July and before the fifth day of December and after the ninth day of January of each year.  No fireworks shall be sold to any person under the age of twelve (12) years.  It shall be unlawful to ignite or discharge fireworks of any type within six hundred (600) feet of any church, hospital or school, or within seventy-five (75) feet of where fireworks are stored or offered for sale.  It shall also be unlawful to ignite or discharge the same within or throw the same from or into or at any motor vehicle. SECTION 3.  Section 45-13-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-13-7.  Fireworks kept for sale at wholesale shall be stored in a room set aside for the storage of fireworks only.  Over the entrance to this room shall be posted a sign reading "FIREWORKS-NO SMOKING-KEEP OPEN FLAMES AWAY." Two (2) approved fire extinguishers shall be provided and kept in close proximity to the stock of fireworks in all buildings where fireworks are sold.  Small temporary stands used for storing and selling fireworks only, in lieu of the fire extinguishers, may have a barrel of water and two (2) buckets available for use as fire extinguishing equipment.  All fireworks kept for sale on counters must remain in original packages unless an attendant is on duty at all times at the counter where the fireworks are on display.  Signs reading "FIREWORKS FOR SALE-NO SMOKING ALLOWED" shall be displayed in the section of any store set aside for the sale of fireworks. SECTION 4.  Section 45-13-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-13-15.  Any person, firm, partnership or corporation violating any provision of this article shall be guilty of a  misdemeanor.  Upon conviction of a first offense, the offender shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and/or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year. Upon conviction of a second offense, the offender shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and/or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year.  Upon conviction of a third or subsequent offense, the offender shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and/or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year.  In addition to said criminal penalties, any person, firm, partnership or corporation violating any provision of this article shall be responsible for any and all injuries, deaths and property damage caused by or resulting from illegal fireworks sold by such person, firm, partnership or corporation which is prohibited by this article within the State of Mississippi, and any injured person or his legal representatives, shall have a right to bring a civil action against the dealer, distributor or manufacturer or person who sold said fireworks, whether said dealer, distributor or manufacturer or person be located in this state or not.  Any dealer, distributor or manufacturer or person located outside of this state who shall sell fireworks in Mississippi shall make, constitute and appoint the Secretary of State as their lawful agent for service of process in any civil proceeding brought under the provisions of this article, to recover all damages caused or resulting from the sale of any fireworks prohibited by this article. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.